Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3106
Waiver prohibited; failure to meet conditions; effect.

The provisions of sections 25-3103 to 25-3105 may not be waived. No payee who proposes to make a transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall incur a penalty, forfeit an application fee or other payment, or otherwise incur any liability to the proposed transferee based on the failure of the transfer to satisfy the conditions of section 25-3104.

Laws 2001, LB 55, § 6.